Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5245.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "state officers public trust guarantee act". Sec. 3. (1) Beginning January 1, 2026, a state officer, for not less than 2 years after leaving public office, shall not accept employment with or provide services for compensation for a person if the state officer, in conducting the state officer's official duties, entered into a contract with that person through a request for proposal or otherwise issued payment to that person for services procured by the department that the state officer was appointed to. (2) An individual who violates this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. (b) "State officer" means an individual appointed by the governor or another executive department official.